Hawaii statutes.
[§39B-3] Application of allocation.
The extent to which all or any part of an allocation made to a county or an
issuer pursuant to section 39B-2 is applied to a project subject to the annual
state ceiling shall be evidenced by a certificate of the issuer or the director
of finance of a county, as applicable. [L 1987, c 62, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next